csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_Imp_n.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     wanishin+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+NA: wanishinookan
     wanishin+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+NA: wanishinookeg
     wanishin+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+NA: wanishinookang
     wanishin+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+NA: wanishingen
     wanishin+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+NA: wanishingegon
     wanishin+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+NA: wanishinziidaa
     wanishin+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+NA: wanishinin
     wanishin+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+NA: [wanishinog,wanishinok]
     wanishin+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+NA: wanishindaa
